Maryland, session 2026, SB0695.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) SECTION 14–1330 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
14–1330.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DRIVER’S LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE OR PERMIT ISSUED BY
THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION UNDER TITLE 16 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE OR A LICENSE TO DRIVE ISSUED BY ANY OTHER
JURISDICTION.
(3) “FINANCIAL INSTITUTION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–101
OF THE FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE.
(4) “IDENTIFICATION CARD” OR “ID CARD” MEANS A CARD ISSUED
UNDER § 12–301 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE OR A COMPARABLE PROVISION
IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION.
(5) “PERSONAL INFORMATION” INCLUDES AN INDIVIDUAL’S NAME,
ADDRESS, DATE OF BIRTH, PHOTOGRAPH, FINGERPRINT, BIOMETRIC DATA,
DRIVER’S LICENSE NUMBER, IDENTIFICATION CARD NUMBER, OR ANY OTHER
UNIQUE PERSONAL IDENTIFIER.
(6) “SWIPE” MEANS PASSING A DRIVER’S LICENSE OR
IDENTIFICATION CARD THROUGH A DEVICE CAPABLE OF READING THE
INFORMATION ENCODED IN A MAGNETIC STRIP OR BARCODE.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
PERSON MAY NOT SWIPE THE DRIVER’S LICENSE OR ID CARD OF AN INDIVIDUAL.

SENATE BILL 695 3
(2) A PERSON MAY SWIPE THE DRIVER’S LICENSE OR ID CARD OF AN
INDIVIDUAL:
(I) TO VERIFY THE AUTHENTICITY OF A DRIVER’S LICENSE OR
ID CARD;
(II) TO VERIFY THE IDENTITY OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
1. MAKES A PURCHASE FROM THE PERSON WITH A
METHOD OTHER THAN CASH;
2. RETURNS AN ITEM PURCHASED; OR
3. REQUESTS A REFUND;
(III) TO VERIFY THE AGE OF THE INDIVIDUAL WHEN PROVIDING
AN AGE–RESTRICTED GOOD OR SERVICE;
(IV) TO PREVENT FRAUD OR OTHER CRIMINAL ACTIVITY IF:
1. THE INDIVIDUAL, WITHOUT PROOF OF PURCHASE OR
A RECEIPT, RETURNS AN ITEM OR REQUESTS A REFUND FROM THE PERSON;
2. THE PERSON USES A FRAUD PREVENTION SERVICE
COMPANY OR SYSTEM; AND
3. THE PERSON DELETES ANY PERSONAL INFORMATION
WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER WHEN THE PERSONAL INFORMATION WAS FIRST
COLLECTED;
(V) TO TRANSMIT INFORMATION TO A CHECK SERVICES
COMPANY FOR THE APPROVAL OF A NEGOTIABLE INSTRUMENT, AN ELECTRONIC
FUNDS TRANSFER, OR ANY OTHER SIMILAR PAYMENT METHOD; AND
(VI) IF THE PERSON IS A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION, TO COLLECT
INFORMATION FOR PROCESSING A DEPOSIT OR LOAN.
(C) (1) IF A PERSON SWIPES A DRIVER’S LICENSE OR ID CARD UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(2)(I) THROUGH (III) OF THIS SECTION, THE PERSON MAY NOT
STORE, SELL, OR SHARE THE PERSONAL INFORMATION COLLECTED.

SENATE BILL 695
(2) IF A PERSON SWIPES A DRIVER’S LICENSE OR ID CARD UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(2)(IV) OR (V) OF THIS SECTION, THE PERSON MAY STORE OR SHARE
ONLY THE FOLLOWING PERSONAL INFORMATION COLLECTED:
(I) NAME;
(II) ADDRESS;
(III) DATE OF BIRTH; AND
(IV) THE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER CONNECTED TO THE SWIPED
DRIVER’S LICENSE OR ID CARD.
(D) (1) A PERSON NOT REGULATED UNDER THE FEDERAL FAIR CREDIT
REPORTING ACT THAT RECEIVES PERSONAL INFORMATION FROM A SWIPED
DRIVER’S LICENSE OR ID CARD MAY USE THE INFORMATION ONLY TO PREVENT
FRAUD AGAINST THE PERSON THAT PROVIDED THE PERSONAL INFORMATION.
(2) A PERSON THAT IS REGULATED UNDER THE FEDERAL FAIR
CREDIT REPORTING ACT THAT RECEIVES PERSONAL INFORMATION FROM A SWIPED
DRIVER’S LICENSE OR ID CARD MAY USE THE INFORMATION ONLY TO PREVENT
FRAUD OR TO EFFECT, ADMINISTER, OR ENFORCE A TRANSACTION.
(E) A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY MAY SWIPE A DRIVER’S LICENSE OR AN ID
CARD OF AN INDIVIDUAL ONLY IF THE DRIVER’S LICENSE OR ID CARD IS:
(1) KNOWINGLY AND WILLINGLY PROVIDED BY THE INDIVIDUAL;
(2) CONFISCATED BY THE GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY;
(3) REQUIRED FOR EMERGENCY ASSISTANCE; OR
(4) MANDATED BY A COURT ORDER.
(F) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OR
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, WHILE ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF OFFICIAL
DUTIES, FROM:
(1) SWIPING AN INDIVIDUAL’S DRIVER’S LICENSE OR
IDENTIFICATION CARD; OR

SENATE BILL 695 5
(2) RECORDING, RETAINING, OR TRANSMITTING PERSONAL
INFORMATION RECEIVED FROM A SWIPED DRIVER’S LICENSE OR IDENTIFICATION
CARD.
(G) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE PENALTY AND ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.